src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON GÅNTSAS !!= @CODE@ Same as TJIEGOS but with vokal change å=oa. Attr is same as pred. Sg Acc: goanntsasav, attr: gåntsas. Consonant gradation.
                 +A:%>X3   ATTR           ;
! +A:%>X3 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:%>X3   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:%>X5   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:%>X5   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X5it ENDLEX         ;
                 +A:%>X5   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: måskas # Odd-syllable test
!!€ måskas:               måskas+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ moasskasav:            måskas+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ måskas:               måskas+A+Attr
!!€ moasskasabbo:          måskas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

! !Must be checked in when lexicon work!
! LEXICON GÅMBAL !!= @CODE@ Same as GÅNTAS å=oa, but with attr -lis. Sg Acc: goammbalav, attr: gåmbalis. Consonant gradation. So far only for gåmbal.
!                  +A:is%> ATTR           ;
! ! +A:%>X3 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
!                  +A:%>X3   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
!                  +A:%>X5   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
!                  +A:%>X5   ABBO/AMOS      ;
!  +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X5it ENDLEX         ;
!                  +A:%>X5   ODDCmp         ;
! 
! ! Test data:
! !!€gt-norm: gåmbal # Odd-syllable test
! !!€ gåmbal:               gåmbal+A+Sg+Nom
! !!€ goammbalav:            gåmbal+A+Sg+Acc
! !!€ gåmbalis:               gåmbal+A+Attr
! !!€ goammbalabbo:          gåmbal+A+Comp+Sg+Nom


LEXICON GALMAS !!= @CODE@  Adjectives on -as, ås- and ás, with attr ending on a (-as and -ás pred) and å (-ås pred). As e. in Spiik. Sg Acc: galmmasav, attr: galmma, Consonant gradation.
                 +A:%>    ATTR           ;
! +A: VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:s%>X2 VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:s%>X2 N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:s%>X5 OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:s%>X5 ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:s%>it ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:s%>X2 R              ;
                 +A:s%>X5 ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: njuoskas # Odd-syllable test
!!€ njuoskas:               njuoskas+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ njuosskasav:            njuoskas+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ njuosska:               njuoskas+A+Attr
!!€ njuosskasabbo:          njuoskas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON SÁJSAS !!= @CODE@  For -as adjectives with attribute -e. Presently only used for "sájsas", because this -as adj gets -e attr. Sg Acc: sájssasav, Attr: sájsse. Consonant gradation.
                 +A:e%>      ATTR           ;
! +A: VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:as%>Q1   VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:as%>Q1   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:a%>X4s   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:a%>X4s   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:a%>X4sit ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:as%>Q1   R              ;
                 +A:a%>X4s   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: sájsas # Odd-syllable test
!!€ sájsas:               sájsas+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ sájssasav:            sájsas+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ sájsse:               sájsas+A+Attr
!!€ sájssasabbo:          sájsas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON RÁDAS !!= @CODE@  Presently only used for "rádas". This word has special consonant gradation d>dd. Attr same as pred. Sg Acc: ráddasav, Attr: rádas. Consonant gradation.
                 +A:as%>    ATTR           ;
! +A:as%> VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:as%>    N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:das%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:das%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:das%>it ENDLEX         ;
                 +A:das%>   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: rádas # Odd-syllable test
!!€ rádas:               rádas+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ ráddasav:            rádas+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ rádas:               rádas+A+Attr
!!€ ráda:               rádas+A+Attr # from LEXATTR
!!€ ráddasabbo:          rádas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON LUOBES !!= @CODE@  Adjectives on -es. Attribute same as pred. Does the same as TJIEGOS only e>a. Sg Acc: luohpasav, Attr: luobes. Consonant gradation.
                 +A:es%>Q1 ATTR           ;
! +A:a VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:es%>Q1 VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:es%>Q1 N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:as%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:as%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:as%>it ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:es%>Q1 R              ;
                 +A:as%>   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: luobes # Odd-syllable test
!!€ luobes:               luobes+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ luohpasav:            luobes+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ luobes:               luobes+A+Attr
!!€ luohpasabbo:          luobes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON GIMES !!= @CODE@  Adjectives on -es with attribute -a. Vocaal e>a in StrG. As g. in Spiik. Sg Acc: gibmasav, Attr: gibma. Consonant gradation.
                 +A:a%>    ATTR           ;
! +A:a VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:es%>Q1 VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:es%>Q1 N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:as%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:as%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:as%>it ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:es%>Q1 R              ;
                 +A:as%>   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: gimes # Odd-syllable test
!!€ gimes:               gimes+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gibmasav:            gimes+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ gibma:               gimes+A+Attr
!!€ gibmasabbo:          gimes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON LINES !!= @CODE@ Same as GIMES, only with e>á in StrG. Adjectives on -es with attribute -a. As g. in Spiik.  Sg Acc: lidnásav, attr: lidna. Consonant gradation.
          +A+Use/NG:a%>    ATTR           ;
! +A:a VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:es%>Q1 VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:es%>Q1 N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:ás%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:ás%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ás%>it ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:es%>Q1 R              ;
                 +A:ás%>   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: lines # Odd-syllable test
!!€ lines:               lines+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ lidnásav:            lines+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ lidna:               lines+A+Attr
!!€ lidnásabbo:          lines+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON OAMES !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -es with attribute -e. As g2. in Spiik. Sg Acc: oabmásav, Attr: oabme. Consonant gradation.
                 +A:%>      ATTR           ;
! +A: VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:s%>Q1   VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:s%>Q1   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:%>X4s   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:%>X4s   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X4sit ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:s%>Q1   R              ;
                 +A:%>X4s   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: goastes # Odd-syllable test
!!€ goastes:               goastes+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ goasstásav:            goastes+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ goasste:               goastes+A+Attr
!!€ goasstásabbo:          goastes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

!LEXICON SNÁVES  ! Does the same as LUOBES
!     +A:es%> ATTR ;
! +A:es VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
! +A:es%> N-ODDCASE ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
! +A:vas%>X5 OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
! +A:vas%>X5 ABBO/AMOS ;
! +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:vas%>X5it K ;
! +A:vas%>X5 ODDCmp ;
