src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
bihtjas:bihttja GALMAS ;
bitjes+v2:bihtj GIMES ; ! According to Kintel
báhkas:báhkka GALMAS ;
dievas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dievva GALMAS ; !
dimes:dibm GIMES ; !According to Tjihkkom and Kintel
dimes:dibm LINES ; ! Attr on -a in StG !According to Spiik
duolvas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duolvva GALMAS ; !
fijnes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fijnn LINES ; !
galmas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:galmma GALMAS ; !
garras+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:garºra GALMAS ; !
gimes:gibm GIMES ;
gimás:gibma GALMAS ;
goastes:goasste OAMES ;
gálnas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gállna GALMAS ; !
gálvas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gálvva GALMAS ; !
gåjkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gåjkke OAMES ; !
gånstas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goansstas GÅNTSAS ; !
gåntsas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goanntsas GÅNTSAS ; !
iehpetjielgas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iehpetjielgga GALMAS ; !
jaŋás:jagŋa GALMAS ;
juoŋas:juogŋa GALMAS ;
jámas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jábma GALMAS ; !
jålbås:jålbbå GALMAS ;
jårbås:jårbbå GALMAS ;
liekkas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:liegga GALMAS ; !
lines:lidn  LINES ;
luobes:luohp LUOBES ;
luotsas:luohtsa GALMAS ;
luvás+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:luvva GALMAS ; !
mieskas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:miesska GALMAS ; !
muovas:muovva GALMAS ;
måskas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:moasskas GÅNTSAS ; !
njuoskas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njuosska GALMAS ; !
oames:oabme OAMES ;
rádas:rád RÁDAS ;
rájnas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rájnna GALMAS ; !
ráttas:rádda GALMAS ; 
saŋás:sagŋa GALMAS ;
sjalkas:sjalkka GALMAS ;
sjliettas+v1:sjliedda GALMAS ; 
sjliettas+v2:sliedda GALMAS ; 
sjánjas:sjádnja GALMAS ;
sjålkås:sjålkkå GALMAS ;
skibás+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skihpa GALMAS ; !
snáves+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:snávv LUOBES ; !
suosas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:suossa GALMAS ; !
sájsas:sájss SÁJSAS ;
tjielgas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjielgga GALMAS ; !
tjåmås:tjåbmå GALMAS ;
tsuskas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tsusska GALMAS ; !
vuorgas:vuorgga GALMAS ;
vánes:vádn LINES ;
ådås:ådå GALMAS ;
